sv: Klubbhuvudets form: Helkrok; Krok; J-huvud; J-krok; Knivhuvud; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Övrigt
en: Stick head shape: Full hook; Hook; J-head; J-hook; Knife head; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Other
ru: Форма головки клюшки: Полный крюк; Крюк; J-образная форма; J-образный крюк; Ножевидная форма; Макси; Макси-загиб; Микро; Миди; Pure control; Другое
zh-TW: 球桿頂部形狀: 全鉤型; 鉤型; J 型頭; J 型鉤; 刀型頭; Maxi; Maxi 捲曲型; Micro; Midi; 純控型; 其他
da: Hovedform for stav: Fuld krog; Krog; J-hoved; J-krog; Knivhoved; Maxi; Maxi-curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Andet
sl-SI: Oblika glave palice: Polna kljuka; Kljuka; J-glava; J-kljuka; Glava v obliki noža; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Popoln nadzor; Drugo
de: Form des Schlägerkopfs: Full Hook; Hook; J-Head; J-Hook; Knife Head; Maxi; Maxi Curl; Micro; Midi; Pure Control; Andere
nl: Stok kopvorm: Volledige haak; Haak; J-kop; J-haak; Meskop; Maxi; Maxi-krul; Micro; Midi; Pure controle; Overig
it: Forma della testa della mazza: Full hook; Hook; J-head; J-hook; Knife head; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Altro
tr: Sopa başı şekli: Tam kanca; Kanca; J başlık; J kanca; Bıçak başlık; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Saf kontrol; Diğer
vi: Hình dạng đầu que: Móc toàn phần; Móc; Đầu chữ J; Móc chữ J; Đầu dao; Maxi; Maxi cong; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Khác
el: Σχήμα κεφαλής μπαστουνιού: Full hook; Γάντζος; Κεφαλή σχήματος J; Γάντζος σχήματος J; Κεφαλή μαχαιριού; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Άλλο
pt-BR: Taco cabeça formato: Gancho completo; Gancho; Cabeça em J; Gancho em J; Cabeça de faca; Maxi; Curva maxi; Micro; Midi; Controle puro; Outro
hu: Pálcikafej Shapes: Teljes horog; Horog; J-fej; J-horog; Késfej; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Egyéb
pt-PT: Forma da cabeça do taco: Gancho completo; Gancho; Cabeça em J; Gancho em J; Cabeça de faca; Maxi; Curva maxi; Micro; Midi; Controlo puro; Outro
es: Formas de cabeza del palo: Gancho completo; Gancho; Cabeza en J; Gancho en J; Cabeza de cuchillo; Maxi; Curva maxi; Micro; Midi; Control puro; Otro
pl: Kształt kosza kija: Full hook (pełny hak); Hook (hak); Główka J (J-head); Hak J (J-hook); Główka nożowa (Knife head); Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Inny
fi: Mailanpään muoto: Täyskoukku; Koukku; J-lapa; J-koukku; Veitsilapa; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Muu
ja: スティックヘッド形状: フルフック; フック; Jヘッド; Jフック; ナイフヘッド; マキシ; マキシカール; マイクロ; ミディ; ピュアコントロール; その他
ro-RO: Formă a capului crosei: Cârlig complet; Cârlig; Cap în formă de J; Cârlig în formă de J; Cap tip cuțit; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Altele
ko: 스틱 헤드 모양: 풀 후크; 후크; J헤드; J후크; 나이프 헤드; 맥시; 맥시 컬; 마이크로; 미디; 퓨어 컨트롤; 기타
zh-CN: 球杆头形状: 全钩型; 钩型; J 型头; J 型钩; 刀型头; Maxi 型; Maxi 弯曲型; Micro 型; Midi 型; 纯控型; 其他
th: Shapesทรงหัวแท่ง: ฟูลฮุก; ฮุก; เจ-เฮด; เจ-ฮุก; มีด; แม็กซี่; แม็กซี่เคิร์ล; ไมโคร; มิดี้; เพียวคอนโทรล; อื่นๆ
nb: Køllebladform: Full krok; Krok; J-hode; J-krok; Knivhode; Maxi; Maxi-curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Annet
cs: Tvar hlavy hokejky: Full hook; Hook; J-head; J-hook; Knife head; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Jiné
lt-LT: Lazdos galvutės forma: Pilnas kablys; Kablys; J formos galvutė; J formos kablys; Peilio formos galvutė; Maxi; „Maxi curl“; Micro; Midi; Visiška kontrolė; Kita
hr-HR: Oblik glave štapa: Puna kuka; Kuka; J-glava; J-kuka; Glava u obliku noža; Maxi; Maxi curl; Micro; Midi; Pure control; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форма на главата на стика: Пълна кука; Кука; J-образна глава; J-образна кука; Глава тип нож; Макси; Макси извивка; Микро; Миди; Pure control; Друго
fr: Forme de la tête du bâton: Crochet complet; Crochet; Tête en J; Crochet en J; Tête couteau; Maxi; Courbure maxi; Micro; Midi; Contrôle pur; Autre
sk-SK: Tvar hlavy hokejky: Plný hák; Hák; J-hlava; J-hák; Nožová hlava; Maxi; Maxi zakrivenie; Mikro; Midi; Čistá kontrola; Iné